Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) No later than 90 days after the effective date of this 2025 Act, the De-
partment of Human Services shall submit to the United States Department of Agriculture  a
request for approval to waive the requirements  of 7 U.S.C. 2014(d)(18) in order to exclude
monthly distributions of an advance payment of the tax  credit available for dependent care
under ORS 315.264 from consideration  in determining eligibility for supplemental nutrition
assistance.
(2) The department shall report the status of the  request to the Legislative Assembly no
later than September 15, 2026, and annually thereafter until September 15  following the date
on which the United States Department of Agriculture approves or denies the request for
waiver.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2031.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 64 (SB 64-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate February 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 64 (SB 64-INTRO) Page 2